Illinois, session 104th, SB3569.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 6-100, 6-100.5, and 6-118 and by adding 6Section 6-100.7 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/6-100)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-100)8    Sec. 6-100. Definitions. For the purposes of this Chapter, 9the following words shall have the meanings ascribed to them:10    (a) Application Process. The process of obtaining a 11driver's license, identification card, or permit. The process 12begins when a person enters a Secretary of State Driver 13Services facility and requests a driver's license, 14identification card or permit.15    (b) Conviction. A final adjudication of guilty by a court 16of competent jurisdiction either after a bench trial, trial by 17jury, plea of guilty, order of forfeiture, or default.18    (c) Identification Card. A document made or issued by or 19under the authority of the United States Government, the State 20of Illinois or any other state or political subdivision 21thereof, or any governmental or quasi-governmental 22organization that, when completed with information concerning 23the individual, is of a type intended or commonly accepted for   SB3569- 2 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1the purpose of identifying the individual.2    (d) Standard driver's license. A driver's license issued 3in a manner which is not compliant with the REAL ID Act and 4implementing regulations. Standard driver's licenses shall be 5marked "Federal Limits Apply" and shall have a color or design 6different from the REAL ID compliant driver's license.7    (e) REAL ID compliant driver's license. A driver's license 8issued in compliance with the REAL ID Act and implementing 9regulations. REAL ID compliant driver's licenses shall bear a 10security marking approved by the United States Department of 11Homeland Security.12    (f) Limited Term REAL ID compliant driver's license. A 13REAL ID compliant driver's license issued to a person who is 14not a permanent resident or citizen of the United States, or an 15individual who has an approved application for asylum in the 16United States or has entered the United States in refugee 17status, and marked "Limited Term" on the face of the license.18    (g) Enhanced driver's license. A driver's license, 19instruction permit, or graduated license to operate a motor 20vehicle issued or issuable under the laws of this State by the 21Secretary of State that denotes citizenship and identity and 22contains technology and security features approved by the 23Secretary of the United States Department of Homeland 24Security. An enhanced driver's license may be used in the same 25manner as a driver's license, instruction permit, or graduated 26license, and is approved by the Secretary of the United States   SB3569- 3 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1Department of Homeland Security for purposes of entering the 2United States. All provisions in this Act relating to a 3driver's license, instruction permit, and graduated license, 4including cancellation, suspension, revocation, 5reinstatement, examination, restriction, expiration, renewal, 6and unlawful acts and violations, apply to an enhanced 7driver's license.8    (h) Enhanced identification card. An identification card 9issued or issuable under the laws of this state by the 10Secretary of state that denotes citizenship and identity and 11contains technology and security features approved by the 12Secretary of the United States Department of Homeland 13Security. An enhanced identification card may be used in the 14same manner as an identification card and is approved by the 15Secretary of the United States Department of Homeland Security 16for purposes of entering the United States.17(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 18    (625 ILCS 5/6-100.5)19    Sec. 6-100.5. Issuance of REAL ID compliant, and standard 20driver's licenses, and enhanced driver's licenses. The 21Secretary of State may issue both REAL ID compliant driver's 22licenses, and standard driver's licenses, and enhanced 23driver's licenses, and may permit applicants to designate 24which type of driver's license they wish to receive. All 25provisions of this Code applicable to standard driver's   SB3569- 4 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1licenses shall also apply to REAL ID compliant driver's 2licenses and enhanced driver's licenses, except where the 3provisions are inconsistent with the REAL ID Act and 4implementing regulations. The Secretary shall establish by 5rule the date on which issuance of REAL ID compliant driver's 6licenses and enhanced driver's licenses will begin.7(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (625 ILCS 5/6-100.7 new)9    Sec. 6-100.7. Enhanced driver's licenses or enhanced 10identification card.11    (a) Upon application, the Secretary of State may issue an 12enhanced driver's license or enhanced identification card. The 13Secretary of State shall not issue an enhanced driver's 14license or enhanced identification card to any person who is:15        (1) under 16 years of age;16        (2) not a resident of this State; or17        (3) not a citizen of the United States of America.18    (b) An enhanced driver's license or enhanced 19identification card may include radio frequency identification 20technology that is limited to a randomly assigned number, 21which must be encrypted if agreed to by the United States 22Department of Homeland Security and does not include biometric 23data or any information other than the citizenship status of 24the license holder or cardholder. The Secretary of State shall 25ensure that the radio frequency identification technology is   SB3569- 5 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1secure from unauthorized data access. An applicant must sign 2an acknowledgment of understanding of the radio frequency 3identification technology and its use for the sole purpose of 4verifying United States citizenship before being issued an 5enhanced driver's license or an enhanced identification card. 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-118)7    Sec. 6-118. Fees. 8    (a) The fees for licenses and permits under this Article 9are as follows:10    Original 4-year driver's license......................$3011    Original 8-year driver's license issued under12        subsection (a-3) of Section 6-115.................$6013    Original driver's license issued14        to 18, 19, and 20 year olds....................... $515    All driver's licenses for persons16    Enhanced driver's license.............................$30 17        age 69 through age 80............................. $518    All driver's licenses for persons19        age 81 through age 86............................. $220    All driver's licenses for persons21        age 87 or older....................................$022    Renewal 4-year driver's license (except for23        applicants age 69 and older)......................$3024    Renewal 8-year driver's license issued under25        subsection (a-3) of Section 6-115 (except  SB3569- 6 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1        for applicants age 69 and older)..................$602    Original instruction permit issued to3        persons (except those age 69 and older)4        who do not hold or have not previously5        held an Illinois instruction permit or6        driver's license................................. $207    Instruction permit issued to any person8        holding an Illinois driver's license9        who wishes a change in classifications,10        other than at the time of renewal................. $511    Any instruction permit issued to a person12        age 69 and older.................................. $513    Instruction permit issued to any person,14        under age 69, not currently holding a15        valid Illinois driver's license or16        instruction permit but who has17        previously been issued either document18        in Illinois...................................... $1019    Restricted driving permit............................. $820    Monitoring device driving permit..................... $8 21    Duplicate or corrected driver's license22        or permit......................................... $523    Duplicate or corrected restricted24        driving permit.................................... $525    Duplicate or corrected monitoring26        device driving permit............................. $5  SB3569- 7 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1    Duplicate driver's license or permit issued to2        an active-duty member of the3        United States Armed Forces,4        the member's spouse, or5        the dependent children living6        with the member.................................. $0 7    Original or renewal M or L endorsement................ $58SPECIAL FEES FOR COMMERCIAL DRIVER'S LICENSE9        The fees for commercial driver licenses and permits 10    under Article V shall be as follows:11    Commercial driver's license:12        $6 for the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund; 13        $20 for the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund;14        $10 for the driver's license;15        and $24 for the CDL:............................. $6016    Renewal commercial driver's license:17        $6 for the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund;18        $20 for the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund;19        $10 for the driver's license; and20        $24 for the CDL:................................. $6021    Commercial learner's permit22        issued to any person holding a valid23        Illinois driver's license for the24        purpose of changing to a25        CDL classification: 26        $6 for the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund;  SB3569- 8 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1        $20 for the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund; and2        $24 for the CDL classification................... $503    Commercial learner's permit4        issued to any person holding a valid5        Illinois CDL for the purpose of6        making a change in a classification,7        endorsement or restriction........................ $58    CDL duplicate or corrected license.................... $59    In order to ensure the proper implementation of the 10Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, Article V of this 11Chapter, the Secretary of State is empowered to prorate the 12$24 fee for the commercial driver's license proportionate to 13the expiration date of the applicant's Illinois driver's 14license.15    The fee for any duplicate license or permit shall be 16waived for any person who presents the Secretary of State's 17office with a police report showing that his license or permit 18was stolen.19    The fee for any duplicate license or permit shall be 20waived for any person age 60 or older whose driver's license or 21permit has been lost or stolen. 22    No additional fee shall be charged for a driver's license, 23or for a commercial driver's license, when issued to the 24holder of an instruction permit for the same classification or 25type of license who becomes eligible for such license.26    The fee for a restricted driving permit under this   SB3569- 9 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1subsection (a) shall be imposed annually until the expiration 2of the permit.3    (a-5) The fee for a driver's record or data contained 4therein is $20 and shall be disbursed as set forth in 5subsection (k) of Section 2-123 of this Code.6    (b) Any person whose license or privilege to operate a 7motor vehicle in this State has been suspended or revoked 8under Section 3-707, any provision of Chapter 6, Chapter 11, 9or Section 7-205, 7-303, or 7-702 of the Illinois Safety and 10Family Financial Responsibility Law of this Code, shall in 11addition to any other fees required by this Code, pay a 12reinstatement fee as follows:13    Suspension under Section 3-707..................... $100 14    Suspension under Section 11-1431....................$100 15    Summary suspension under Section 11-501.1...........$250 16    Suspension under Section 11-501.9...................$250 17    Summary revocation under Section 11-501.1............$50018    Other suspension......................................$7019    Revocation...........................................$50020    However, any person whose license or privilege to operate 21a motor vehicle in this State has been suspended or revoked for 22a second or subsequent time for a violation of Section 11-501, 2311-501.1, or 11-501.9 of this Code or a similar provision of a 24local ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense or Section 259-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 26and each suspension or revocation was for a violation of   SB3569- 10 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1Section 11-501, 11-501.1, or 11-501.9 of this Code or a 2similar provision of a local ordinance or a similar 3out-of-state offense or Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 41961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 shall pay, in addition to any 5other fees required by this Code, a reinstatement fee as 6follows:7    Summary suspension under Section 11-501.1............$5008    Suspension under Section 11-501.9...................$500 9    Summary revocation under Section 11-501.1............$50010    Revocation...........................................$50011    (c) All fees collected under the provisions of this 12Chapter 6 shall be disbursed under subsection (g) of Section 132-119 of this Code, except as follows:14        1. The following amounts shall be paid into the 15    Drivers Education Fund:16            (A) $16 of the $20 fee for an original driver's 17        instruction permit;18            (B) one-sixth of the fee for an original driver's 19        license;20            (C) one-sixth of the fee for a renewal driver's 21        license; 22            (D) $4 of the $8 fee for a restricted driving 23        permit; and24            (E) $4 of the $8 fee for a monitoring device 25        driving permit. 26        2. $30 of the $250 fee for reinstatement of a license   SB3569- 11 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1    summarily suspended under Section 11-501.1 or suspended 2    under Section 11-501.9 shall be deposited into the Drunk 3    and Drugged Driving Prevention Fund. However, for a person 4    whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in 5    this State has been suspended or revoked for a second or 6    subsequent time for a violation of Section 11-501, 7    11-501.1, or 11-501.9 of this Code or Section 9-3 of the 8    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, $190 of 9    the $500 fee for reinstatement of a license summarily 10    suspended under Section 11-501.1 or suspended under 11    Section 11-501.9, and $190 of the $500 fee for 12    reinstatement of a revoked license shall be deposited into 13    the Drunk and Drugged Driving Prevention Fund. $190 of the 14    $500 fee for reinstatement of a license summarily revoked 15    pursuant to Section 11-501.1 shall be deposited into the 16    Drunk and Drugged Driving Prevention Fund.17        3. $6 of the original or renewal fee for a commercial 18    driver's license and $6 of the commercial learner's permit 19    fee when the permit is issued to any person holding a valid 20    Illinois driver's license, shall be paid into the 21    CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund.22        4. $30 of the $70 fee for reinstatement of a license 23    suspended under the Illinois Safety and Family Financial 24    Responsibility Law shall be paid into the Family 25    Responsibility Fund.26        5. The $5 fee for each original or renewal M or L   SB3569- 12 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1    endorsement shall be deposited into the Cycle Rider Safety 2    Training Fund.3        6. $20 of any original or renewal fee for a commercial 4    driver's license or commercial learner's permit shall be 5    paid into the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund.6        7. The following amounts shall be paid into the 7    General Revenue Fund:8            (A) $190 of the $250 reinstatement fee for a 9        summary suspension under Section 11-501.1 or a 10        suspension under Section 11-501.9;11            (B) $40 of the $70 reinstatement fee for any other 12        suspension provided in subsection (b) of this Section; 13        and14            (C) $440 of the $500 reinstatement fee for a first 15        offense revocation and $310 of the $500 reinstatement 16        fee for a second or subsequent revocation.17        8. Fees collected under paragraph (4) of subsection 18    (d) and subsection (h) of Section 6-205 of this Code; 19    subparagraph (C) of paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of 20    Section 6-206 of this Code; and paragraph (4) of 21    subsection (a) of Section 6-206.1 of this Code, shall be 22    paid into the funds set forth in those Sections. 23    (d) All of the proceeds of the additional fees imposed by 24Public Act 96-34 shall be deposited into the Capital Projects 25Fund. 26    (e) The additional fees imposed by Public Act 96-38 shall   SB3569- 13 -LRB104 19772 LNS 33222 b1become effective 90 days after becoming law. The additional 2fees imposed by Public Act 103-8 shall become effective July 31, 2023 and shall be paid into the Secretary of State Special 4Services Fund. 5    (f) As used in this Section, "active-duty member of the 6United States Armed Forces" means a member of the Armed 7Services or Reserve Forces of the United States or a member of 8the Illinois National Guard who is called to active duty 9pursuant to an executive order of the President of the United 10States, an act of the Congress of the United States, or an 11order of the Governor. 12(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 7-1-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 13103-872, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-435, eff. 1411-21-25.)